Arkansas, session 2025, SB24.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q249U AGFC DIRECTOR 1 $170,437
(2) Q250U AGFC CHIEF OF STAFF 1 $136,703
(3) Q251U AGFC DEPUTY DIRECTOR 3 $135,253
(4) Q255U AGFC CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 $132,292
(5) Q252U AGFC VETERINARIAN 1 $130,050
(6) Q256U AGFC COLONEL 1 $128,282
(7) Q266U AGFC IT ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR 1 $127,986
*CJW006*
01-22-2025 10:52:12 CJW006

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB24
(8) Q371U AGFC CHIEF OF HUMAN RESOURCES 1 $125,049
(9) Q370U AGFC CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER 1 $125,049
(10) Q254U AGFC GENERAL COUNSEL 1 $125,049
(11) Q404U AGFC LIEUTENANT COLONEL 1 $121,923
(12) Q375U AGFC CHIEF OF FISHERIES 1 $121,321
(13) Q374U AGFC CHIEF OF WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT 1 $121,321
(14) Q373U AGFC CHIEF OF EDUCATION 1 $121,321
(15) Q372U AGFC CHIEF OF OPERATIONS 1 $121,321
(16) Q393U AGFC DEPUTY GENERAL COUNSEL 1 $117,593
(17) Q392U AGFC CONTROLLER 1 $117,593
(18) Q381U AGFC CHIEF OF RESEARCH 1 $117,593
(19) Q380U AGFC CHIEF OF SHOOTING SPORTS 1 $117,593
(20) Q379U AGFC CHIEF OF PRIVATE LANDS MANAGEMENT 1 $117,593
(21) Q378U AGFC CHIEF OF ENVIRONMENTAL COORDINATION 1 $117,593
(22) Q377U AGFC CHIEF OF GIS 1 $117,593
(23) Q376U AGFC CHIEF OF COMMUNICATIONS 1 $117,593
(24) Q261U AGFC MAJOR 3 $115,563
(25) Q265U AGFC IT SOFTWARE ENGINEER LEAD 1 $113,591
(26) Q258U AGFC GIS LEAD 1 $113,591
(27) AGFC INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY POOL 13 $113,591
Q383U AGFC IT SECURITY SPECIALIST $113,591
Q382U AGFC IT DATA SCIENTIST $113,591
Q384U AGFC IT SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR $113,591
Q386U AGFC IT SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST $98,718
Q385U AGFC IT DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR $98,718
Q283U AGFC IT SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST $95,269
Q387U AGFC IT PROJECT MANAGER $95,269
Q388U AGFC IT NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST $95,269
Q389U AGFC IT SYSTEMS SPECIALIST $95,269
Q410U AGFC IT PROJECT COORDINATOR $90,064
Q390U AGFC IT COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST $90,064
Q308U AGFC IT WEBSITE DEVELOPER $78,575
Q391U AGFC IT ASSET MANAGER $78,575
Q365U AGFC IT SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST $72,345
Q311U AGFC IT COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST $72,345
Q409U AGFC IT DATA ANALYST $67,267
01-22-2025 10:52:12 CJW006

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB24
Q364U AGFC IT SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST $66,316
(28) Q267U AGFC CAPTAIN 14 $107,692
(29) Q260U AGFC DIVISION ASST CHIEF 24 $105,933
(30) Q276U AGFC LIEUTENANT 15 $103,930
(31) Q284U AGFC SERGEANT 26 $100,285
(32) AGFC CONS PROGRAM BIOLOGIST POOL 90 $99,107
Q394U AGFC CONS PROGRAM BIOLOGIST III $99,107
Q402U AGFC CONS PROGRAM BIOLOGIST II $89,744
Q403U AGFC CONS PROGRAM BIOLOGIST I $86,609
(33) Q268U AGFC ASSISTANT CONTROLLER 1 $98,718
(34) AGFC ATTORNEY POOL 2 $98,718
Q452U AGFC ATTORNEY SPECIALIST $98,718
Q269U AGFC ATTORNEY $89,744
(35) AGFC GIS POOL 6 $98,718
Q271U AGFC SENIOR GIS ANALYST $98,718
Q279U AGFC GIS ANALYST $95,269
Q356U AGFC GIS TECHNICIAN $68,354
(36) Q368U AGFC STATEWIDE PROJECT MANAGER 8 $98,718
(37) AGFC ENFORCEMENT POOL 126 $96,748
Q288U AGFC CORPORAL $96,748
Q299U AGFC GAME WARDEN 1ST CLASS $90,004
Q309U AGFC GAME WARDEN $85,718
(38) AGFC SKILLED TRADES POOL 28 $89,744
Q278U AGFC OPERATIONS & FACILITY MANAGER $89,744
Q396U AGFC FLEET MANAGER $86,609
Q307U AGFC SURVEYOR $78,576
Q306U AGFC REAL ESTATE OFFICER $75,004
Q285U AGFC CONSTRUCTION MANAGER $71,432
Q315U AGFC MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR $71,432
Q400U AGFC REGIONAL FACILITY MANAGER $71,432
Q319U AGFC COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS SUPERVISOR $68,031
Q326U AGFC SKILLED TRADESMAN $68,031
Q304U AGFC CENTRAL WAREHOUSE OPERATIONS MANAGER $61,706
Q327U AGFC AUTO/DIESEL MECHANIC $61,706
Q335U AGFC MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN $61,706
Q329U AGFC CALIBRATION TECHNICIAN $58,767
01-22-2025 10:52:12 CJW006

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB24
Q331U FIRING RANGE SPECIALIST $58,767
(39) AGFC HR POOL 4 $89,744
Q408U AGFC PAYROLL MANAGER $89,744
Q292U AGFC PERSONNEL MANAGER $89,081
Q301U AGFC ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER $75,004
Q313U AGFC HUMAN RESOURCE ANALYST $68,031
(40) AGFC EDUCATION PROGRAM POOL 51 $86,609
Q277U AGFC NATURE CENTER/SHOOTING FAC MGR II $86,609
Q296U AGFC EDUCATION STATEWIDE COORDINATOR $75,004
Q353U AGFC NATURE CENTER/SHOOTING FAC MGR I $75,004
Q302U AGFC EDUCATION PROGRAM SPECIALIST $71,432
(41) AGFC GRANTS MANAGEMENT POOL 4 $86,609
Q291U AGFC GRANTS MANAGER $86,609
Q398U AGFC GRANTS COORDINATOR II $75,004
Q297U AGFC GRANTS COORDINATOR I $71,432
(42) Q354U AGFC ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 $86,609
(43) AGFC BIOLOGIST POOL 109 $80,624
Q395U AGFC BIOLOGIST II $80,624
Q294U AGFC BIOLOGIST I $75,004
Q310U AGFC BIOLOGICAL TECHNICIAN II $68,031
Q337U AGFC BIOLOGICAL TECHNICIAN I $61,706
(44) Q450U AGFC FOI COORDINATOR 1 $75,004
(44.1)Q294U AGFC BIOLOGIST I 3 $75,004
(45) Q303U AGFC EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 1 $75,004
(46) AGFC ADMIN SUPPORT POOL 37 $75,004
Q318U AGFC REGIONAL OFFICES ADMINISTRATOR $75,004
Q323U AGFC ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST $68,031
Q328U AGFC ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE COORDINATOR $64,644
Q339U AGFC ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST $58,767
(47) AGFC ACCOUNTING POOL 3 $75,004
Q357U AGFC ACCOUNTANT II $75,004
Q406U AGFC ACCOUNTANT I $71,432
(48) AGFC COMMUNICATIONS POOL 10 $75,004
Q397U AGFC CREATIVE ARTIST $75,004
Q399U AGFC COMMUNICATIONS COORDINATOR $71,432
Q316U AGFC PHOTOGRAPHER $71,432
01-22-2025 10:52:12 CJW006

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB24
Q330U AGFC COMMERCIAL GRAPHIC ARTIST $64,444
Q336U AGFC MULTIMEDIA SPECIALIST $61,706
(49) Q435U AGFC TELECOMMUNICATIONS MANAGER 1 $75,004
(50) Q300U AGFC LICENSING SUPERVISOR 2 $75,004
(51) Q298U AGFC PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR 1 $75,004
(52) Q322U AGFC TELECOMMUNICATIONS SUPERVISOR 1 $68,031
(53) Q314U AGFC LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 $68,031
(54) Q305U AGFC FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 $67,877
(55) AGFC FISCAL SUPPORT POOL 12 $61,706
Q324U AGFC FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST $61,706
Q340U AGFC FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST $58,767
(56) Q333U AGFC TELECOMMUNICATIONS SPECIALIST 9 $61,706
(57) Q401U AGFC PRINTER/MAIL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 $58,767
(58) Q343U AGFC LICENSING SPECIALIST 8 $58,767
(59) Q334U AGFC INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 1 $58,767
(60) Q332U AGFC FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER 1 $58,767
(61) Q341U AGFC FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 1 $50,131
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 647

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Arkansas
State Game and Fish Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one hundred
eighty-five (185) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, to be payable from the Game
Protection Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas
State Game and Fish Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
01-22-2025 10:52:12 CJW006

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB24
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $45,121,544
(02) EXTRA HELP 1,891,500
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 16,455,708
(04) OVERTIME 250,000
(05) UNIFORM ALLOWANCE 1,000,000
(06) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 54,728,848
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 517,727
(C) PROF. FEES 4,070,553
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 8,628,647
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(07) GAME AND FISH GRANTS 9,292,451
(08) CONSTRUCTION 17,238,903
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $159,195,881

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - GAS LEASE REVENUES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, to be payable
from the Game Protection Fund, for maintenance and general operations,
capital projects, acquisition of land and conservation easements, grants, and
expenses associated with Disaster Response of the Arkansas State Game and
Fish Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $850,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 350,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 750,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) GAS LEASE GRANTS 50,000
(03) DISASTER RESPONSE 3,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $5,000,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - FARM BILL BIOLOGISTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, to be payable
01-22-2025 10:52:12 CJW006

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB24
from the Game Protection Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
associated with implementing Farm Bill Programs of the Arkansas State Game
and Fish Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $479,508
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 164,143
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,350
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 14,580
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $659,581

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - CONSERVATION PARTNERS PROGRAM GRANTS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, to be
payable from the Game Protection Fund, for grants to conservation partners,
or other eligible entities for operating, equipment, and maintenance expenses
associated with addressing statewide hunger needs of the Arkansas State Game
and Fish Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CONSERVATION PARTNERS PROGRAM GRANTS $150,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - BLACK RIVER SETTLEMENT FUNDS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, to be
payable from the Game Protection Fund, for all expenses associated with the
mitigation to the hardwood timber destruction in the Wildlife Management
Area, inclusive of Regular Salaries and Personal Services Matching of the
Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
01-22-2025 10:52:12 CJW006

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB24
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RESTORATION OF BLACK RIVER WMA
EXPENSES $13,250,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - MARINE FUEL TAX PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, to be payable
from the Game Protection Fund, for personal services, operating expenses and
expenditures associated with increasing and improving access to waterways of
the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MARINE FUEL TAX PROGRAM $6,000,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - GTR AND WETLAND HABITAT RESTORATION. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, to be
payable from the Game Protection Fund, for all expenses associated with
Greentree reservoir renovation and other wetland habitat restoration of the
Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GTR & WETLAND HABITAT RENOVATION $20,000,000

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. PAYMENT OF
REWARDS. Payment of rewards shall be from the Game Protection Fund from the
Commission's Maintenance and General Operation appropriation as herein
appropriated in the Operating Expenses line item of the Operations
appropriation.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
01-22-2025 10:52:12 CJW006

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB24
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROVISION. After receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, and prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee, the Agency is authorized to transfer appropriation from any line
item authorized in the Operations appropriation to any other line item
authorized in the Operations appropriation and the Agency is authorized to
transfer appropriation from any line item authorized in the Gas Lease
Revenues appropriation to any other line item authorized in the same section.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
PROMOTIONAL ITEMS. The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission is hereby
authorized to purchase from the Maintenance & General Operation
Classifications in the Operations Appropriation provided by this Act for
promotional items in an amount not to exceed fifty thousand dollars
($50,000), as authorized by the Director of the Commission to meet fish and
wildlife conservation and education needs.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 13. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. DIRECTOR
SALARY INCREASE RESTRICTION. The Arkansas Game and Fish Commission Director
shall not receive any salary adjustment that exceeds their June 17, 2024 2025
actual salary by more than five percent (5%) without first receiving prior
approval from the Legislative Council or if the General Assembly is in
regular session, fiscal session, or extraordinary session, the Joint Budget
Committee.
It is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain
oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of
this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
01-22-2025 10:52:12 CJW006

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB24
jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect through June 30, 2025
2026.

SECTION 14. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 15. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 16. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee
01-22-2025 10:52:12 CJW006